Maryland, session 2026, HB0629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Maryland Energy Administration shall conduct a study on land–based
wind energy generating systems in the State.
(b) The study shall include:
(1) the total potential for land–based wind energy generation in the State;
(2) a description of the locations used to determine the total potential for
land–based wind energy generation under item (1) of this subsection;
(3) information on locations in the United States where mitigation efforts
have been successfully employed to allow wind energy generating systems and military
radar technologies, including the Advanced Dynamic Aircraft Measurement System
(ADAMS), to operate successfully in the same area;
(4) a description of the successful mitigation efforts identified under item
(3) of this subsection, the effects of the mitigation efforts, and the potential for their use in
the State; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0629*

HOUSE BILL 629
(5) any other relevant matter, as determined by the Administration.
(c) The Administration may use available funds in the Strategic Energy
Investment Fund under § 9–20B–05 of the State Government Article to conduct the study
required under subsection (a) of this section.
(d) On or before December 1, 2026, the Administration shall report its findings
and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment
and the House Environment and Transportation Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.